incubator/apertium-mal/dev/latin/apertium-mal.mal.lexc
LEXICON V-COMMON-CHAKUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>̔ākuka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>̔ākān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>ttirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>̔ākunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>ttu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ttukeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<past%>:%>ttukeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<fut%>:%>ttukeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>̔ākunna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>tta GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%>̔āk # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>kaṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>kū # ; !""


LEXICON V-COMMON-THOTUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>̔uka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>̔ān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>ṭirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>ṭunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>ṭu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ṭukeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ṭukeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ṭukeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>̔unna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>ṭa GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%> # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>ṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>̔ū # ; !""

LEXICON V-COMMON-UZHUTHUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>̔utuka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>̔ān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>̔utirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>̔unnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>̔utu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>̔utukeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<past%>:%>̔utukeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<fut%>:%>̔utukeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>̔unna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>̔uta GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%> # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>ṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>̔ū # ; !""

LEXICON V-COMMON-EALKUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>lkkuka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>lkān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>ṟṟirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>lkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>ṟṟu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ṟṟukeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<past%>:%>ṟṟukeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<fut%>:%>ṟṟukeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>lkunna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>ṟṟa GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%>lk # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>lkaṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>lkū # ; !""



LEXICON V-COMMON-NIKAZHUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>ḻuka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>ḻān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>r‍ttiyirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>ḻunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>ḻtti NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ḻttikeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<past%>:%>ḻttikeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<fut%>:%>ḻttikeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>ḻttunna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>ḻtti GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%>ḻtt # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>ḻttaṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>ḻū # ; !""


LEXICON V-COMMON-KAKKUKA
%<inf_k%>:%>kkuka CLIT-CC ; ! "" ! FIXME
%<inf_n%>:%>kkān‍ CLIT-CC ; ! "̔" ! 
%<perf%>:%>ṭṭirunnu CLIT-ITG ; ! "̔" ! 
%<pres%>:%>kkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! "̔̔"
%<past%>:%>ṭṭu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<pres%>:%>ṭṭukeāṇṭirikkunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<past%>:%>ṭṭukeāṇṭirunnu NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<iter%>%<fut%>:%>ṭṭukeāṇṭirikkuṁ NEG-WHEN ; ! ""
%<gpr_pres%>:%>kkunna GPR-PRES ; ! ""
%<gpr_past%>:%>ṭṭa GPR-PAST ; ! ""
%<imp%>:%>kk # ; !""
%<imp%>%<frml%>:%>kkaṇaṁ # ; !""
%<imp%>%<infml%>:%>kkū # ; !""

LEXICON V-TV-VERUKKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VERUKKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-NOVUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NOVUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-KARAYUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KARAYUKA  ; ! ""

 
LEXICON V-TV-KOLLUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KOLLUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-ALANNU
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON‌-ALANNU  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-THARUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-THARUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-VILKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VILKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-VEENU
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VEENU  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-VIRALUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VIRALUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-NILKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NILKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-THAZHUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-THAZHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-PERUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-PERUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-ATIKKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-ATIKKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-VEIKUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VEIKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-PATUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-PATUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-CHAKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-CHAKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-THOTUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-THOTUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-NERUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NERUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-PILARKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-PILARKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-UZHUTHUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-UZHUTHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-EALKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-EALKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-NIKAZHUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NIKAZHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-KAKKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KAKKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-THEERUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-THEERUKA ; ! "" 
  
LEXICON V-TV-THINNUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-THINNUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-KITTUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KITTUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-VARUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VARUKA; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-IRUNNU
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-IRUNNU ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-CHEYYUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-CHEYYUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-ISHTAPETUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-ISHTAPETUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-URANGUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-URANGUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-POKUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-POKUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-NADAKKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NADAKKUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-KANDETHUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KANDETHUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-KELKKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KELKKUKA ; ! "" 
 
LEXICON V-TV-NOKKUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NOKKUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON V-TV-LABHIKKUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-LABHIKKUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON V-TV-ENNI
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-ENNI ; ! ""

LEXICON V-TV-ARIYUKA

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-ARIYUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON V-IV-KALI

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KALI ; ! ""

LEXICON V-TV-KANUKA

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KANU ; ! ""
!reverse
LEXICON V-IV-VERUKKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VERUKKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-NOVUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NOVUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-KARAYUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-KARAYUKA  ; ! ""

 
LEXICON V-IV-KOLLUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KOLLUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-ALANNU
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON‌-ALANNU  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-THARUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-THARUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-VILKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-VILKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-VEENU
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VEENU  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-VIRALUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VIRALUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-NILKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NILKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-THAZHUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-THAZHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-PERUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-PERUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-ATIKKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-ATIKKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-VEIKUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VEIKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-PATUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-PATUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-CHAKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-CHAKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-IV-THOTUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-THOTUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-NERUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NERUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-PILARKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-PILARKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-UZHUTHUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-UZHUTHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-EALKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-EALKUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-NIKAZHUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NIKAZHUKA  ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-KAKKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KAKKUKA  ; ! "" 


LEXICON V-TV-THEERUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-THEERUKA ; ! "" 
  
LEXICON V-IV-THINNUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-THINNUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-KITTUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KITTUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-VARUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-VARUKA; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-IRUNNU
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-IRUNNU ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-CHEYYUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-CHEYYUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-ISHTAPETUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-ISHTAPETUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-URANGUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-URANGUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-POKUKA 
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-POKUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-TV-NADAKKUKA
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-COMMON-NADAKKUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-KANDETHUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KANDETHUKA ; ! "" 

LEXICON V-IV-KELKKUKA
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-KELKKUKA ; ! "" 
 
LEXICON V-IV-NOKKUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-NOKKUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON V-IV-LABHIKKUKA 
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-COMMON-LABHIKKUKA ; ! ""

LEXICON Verbs
upayēāgikkuka:upayēāgi V-IV-KALI ; ! "upayēāgikkuka" ! "use"
cēādikkuka:cēādi V-IV-KALI ; ! "cēādikkuka" ! "ask"
sansārikkuka:sansāri V-IV-KALI ; ! "sansārikkuka" ! "talk"
kāṇuka:ka  V-TV-KANUKA ; ! "kāṇuka" ! "see"
aṟiyuka:aṟi V-TV-ARIYUKA ; ! "aṟiyuka" ! "know"
kuṟayuka:kuṟa V-TV-ARIYUKA ; ! "" ! "reduce"
nēākkuka:nēākka  V-TV-NOKKUKA ; ! "nēākkuka" ! "look"
kūṭuka:kūṭa  V-TV-NOKKUKA ; ! "" ! "increase"
naṭattuka:naṭatta V-TV-NOKKUKA ; ! "" ! ""
celuttuka:celutta V-IV-NOKKUKA ; ! "" ! ""
uḷ‍peṭuttuka:uḷ‍ppeṭutta V-TV-NOKKUKA ; ! "" ! "include"
irikkuka:ira V-IV-IRUNNU ; ! "irikkuka" ! "sit"
labhikkuka:labha V-TV-LABHIKKUKA ; ! "labhikkuka" ! "get"
cirikkuka:ciri V-IV-KALI ; ! "cirikkuka" ! "laugh"
naṭakkuka:naṭa V-IV-NADAKKUKA ; ! "naṭakkuka" ! "walk"
kaṇṭupiṭikkuka:kaṇṭupiṭa V-TV-LABHIKKUKA ; ! "kaṇṭupiṭikkuka" ! "find"
kēḷ‍kkuka:kē V-TV-KELKKUKA ; ! "kēḷ‍kkuka" ! "hear"
kuṭikkuka:kuṭa V-TV-LABHIKKUKA ; ! "kuṭikkuka" ! "drink"
vāṅṅuka:vāṅṅa  V-IV-URANGUKA ; ! "uṟaṅṅuka" ! "sleep"
cumattuka:cumatta V-IV-URANGUKA ; ! "" ! "'
manas'silākkuka:manas'silākka V-TV-URANGUKA ; ! "" ! "'
eṇṇuka:eṇṇa V-TV-ENNI ; ! "eṇṇuka" ! "count" 
paratuka:parata V-TV-ENNI ; ! "paratuka" !  "search"
kaṇṭettuka:kaṇṭetta  V-TV-KANDETHUKA ; ! "kaṇṭettuka" ! "find"
ceyyuka:ceya V-TV-CHEYYUKA ;! "ceyyuka" ! "do" 
paṟayuka:paṟa V-TV-ARIYUKA ; ! "paṟayuka" ! "tell"
kaḻiyuka:kaḻi V-TV-ARIYUKA ; ! "kaḻiyuka" ! "can"
varuka:va V-IV-THARUKA ; ! "varuka" ! "come "
pēākuka:pēā V-IV-POKUKA ; ! "pēākuka" ! "go"
iṣṭappeṭuka:iṣṭappe  V-TV-ISHTAPETUKA ; ! "iṣṭappeṭuka" ! "love"
paṅkiṭuka:paṅki  V-TV-ISHTAPETUKA ; ! "" ! "share"
aṟiyappeṭuka:aṟiyappe V-TV-ISHTAPETUKA ; ! "" ! "known "
karutuka:karuta V-IV-URANGUKA ; ! "FIXME" ! "think"
māṟuka:māṟa V-IV-URANGUKA ; ! "FIXME" ! "change"
kiṭṭuka:kiṭṭa V-TV-KITTUKA ; ! "FIXME" ! "get"
tinnuka:tinna V-TV-THINNUKA ; ! "FIXME" ! "eat"
tīruka :tīra V-IV-THEERUKA ; ! "FIXME" ! "finish"
veṟukkuka:veṟu V-TV-VERUKKUKA ; ! "veṟukkuka" ! "hate"
eṭukkuka:eṭu V-TV-VERUKKUKA ; ! "" ! "separate"
nēāvuka:na V-IV-NOVUKA ; ! "nēāvuka" ! "pain"
karayuka:kara V-IV-KARAYUKA ; ! "karayuka" ! "cry"
keālluka:keā V-TV-KOLLUKA ; ! "keālluka" ! "kill"
aḷakkuka:aḷa V-TV-ALANNU ; ! "aḷakkuka" ! "measure"
taruka:ta V-TV-THARUKA ; ! "taruka" ! "give"
vil‍kkuka:vi V-TV-VILKUKA ; ! "vil‍kkuka" ! "sell"
vīḻuka:vī V-IV-VEENU ; ! "vīḻuka" ! "fall"
viraḷuka:vira V-IV-VIRALUKA; ! "viraḷuka" ! "scare"
nil‍kkuka:ni V-TV-NILKUKA ; !"nil‍kkuka" ! "stand"
tāḻuka:tāḻa V-IV-THAZHUKA ; ! "tāḻuka" ! "fall down" 
peṟuka:pe V-TV-PERUKA ; ! "peṟuka"
pravar‍ttikkuka:pravar‍tti V-IV-ATIKKUKA ; ! "pravar‍ttikkuka" ! "do"
abhinayikkuka:abhinayi V-IV-ATIKKUKA ; ! "" ! "act"
apēkṣikkuka:apēkṣi V-IV-ATIKKUKA; ! "apēkṣikkuka"! "Ask"
abhyar‍t'thikkuka:abhyar‍t'thi V-IV-ATIKKUKA; ! "abhyar‍t'thikkuka"! "Ask"
āgamikkuka:āgami V-TV-ATIKKUKA; ! "āgamikkuka"! "Come"
ghaṭippikkuka:ghaṭippi V-TV-ATIKKUKA; ! "ghaṭippikkuka"! "Construct"
paṇikaḻippikkuka:paṇikaḻippi V-TV-ATIKKUKA; ! "paṇikaḻippikkuka"! "Construct"
prakhyāpikkuka:prakhyāpi  V-TV-ATIKKUKA; ! "" ! "announce"
saṅkēācippikkuka:saṅkēācippi V-TV-ATIKKUKA; ! "saṅkēācippikkuka"! "Draw"
vaikuka:vaika V-IV-VEIKUKA ; ! "vaikuka" ! "delay"
kiṭṭuka:kiṭṭa V-TV-VEIKUKA ; ! "" ! "get"
nēṭuka:nēṭa V-TV-PATUKA; ! "nēṭuka ! "achive"
tuṭaṅṅuka:tuṭaṅṅa V-TV-PATUKA; ! "tuṭaṅṅuka" ! "start"
oḻukuka:oḻuka V-TV-PATUKA ; ! "oḻukuka" ! "flow"
puṟattiṟaṅṅuka:puṟattiṟaṅṅa V-TV-PATUKA ; ! " " ! ""
cākuka:ca V-IV-CHAKUKA; ! "cākuka" ! "die"
teāṭuka:teāṭa V-TV-THOTUKA ; ! "teāṭuka" ! "touch"
nēruka:nē V-TV-NERUKA ; ! "nēruka" ! "wish"
uyaruka:uya V-IV-NERUKA ; ! "" ! "arise"
cēruka:cē V-TV-NERUKA ; ! "" ! "join"
etticcēruka:etticcē V-IV-NERUKA ; ! "" ! "arrive"
piḷar‍kkuka:piḷa V-TV-PILARKUKA ; ! "piḷar‍kkuka" ! "cut"
uḻutuka:uḻa V-TV-UZHUTHUKA ; ! "uḻutuka" ! "" 
ēlkkuka:ē  V-TV-EALKUKA ; ! "ēlkkuka"
nikaḻuka:nika V-TV-NIKAZHUKA; ! "nikaḻuka"
kakkuka:ka V-TV-KAKKUKA; ! "kakkuka"
iruḷuka:iru V-IV-VIRALUKA ; ! "'
kūṭuka:kūṭa V-IV-VEIKUKA ; ! ""
